Alabama, session 2026rs, HB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 40-1-46, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§40-1-46
(a) Any appraiser, mapper, or tax administrator, or
Page 1

(a) Any appraiser, mapper, or tax administrator, or
HB378 INTRODUCED
licensing administrator who successfully completes the
Department of Revenue Professional Education and Training
Program, and is awarded the designation "Alabama Certified
Appraiser," "Alabama Certified Mapper," or "Alabama Certified
Tax Administrator," or "Alabama Certified Licensing
Administrator" shall be paid the amount of $1,200one thousand
two hundred dollars ($1,200) annually by the Department of
Revenue for his or her professional achievement.
(b) The department shall make suchthe payment to a
certified appraiser, mapper, or tax administrator, or
licensing administrator while suchthe individual is in the
employment of the county, in the ad valorem tax field. Each
individual is limited to payment for one certification. The
department shall make the payments from the funds now
appropriated under the provisions of Section 40-7-70. The
payments made to a certified appraiser, mapper, or tax
administrator, or licensing administrator shall be in addition
to any other salary or compensation. Any personindividual
obtaining and retaining certified designation shall be prima
facie qualified for the position designated. To receive this
compensation, the individual must have been certified for six
months prior to October first1. The Department of Revenue will
provide the rules and regulations to implement payment, during
the first quarter of the fiscal year."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2